tests/numerals.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Cases 0": 
    нуул<num><subst><acc> : нуулу
    нуул<num><subst><par> : нуулла
    нуул<num><subst><dat> : нуулга

  "Cases 1": 
    биир<num><subst><acc> : биири
    биир<num><subst><par> : биирдэ
    биир<num><subst><dat> : бииргэ
  
  "Cases 2":
    икки<num><subst><acc> : иккини
    икки<num><subst><par> : иккитэ
    икки<num><subst><dat> : иккигэ

  "Cases 3": 
    үс<num><subst><acc> : үһү
    үс<num><subst><par> : үстэ
    үс<num><subst><dat> : үскэ

  "Cases 4": 
    түөрт<num><subst><acc> : түөрдү
    түөрт<num><subst><par> : түөрттэ
    түөрт<num><subst><dat> : түөрткэ

  "Cases 5": 
    биэс<num><subst><acc> : биэһи
    биэс<num><subst><par> : биэстэ
    биэс<num><subst><dat> : биэскэ

  "Cases 6": 
    алта<num><subst><acc> : алтаны
    алта<num><subst><par> : алтата
    алта<num><subst><dat> : алтаҕа

  "Cases 7": 
    сэттэ<num><subst><acc> : сэттэни
    сэттэ<num><subst><par> : сэттэтэ
    сэттэ<num><subst><dat> : сэттэҕэ
  
  "Cases 8":
    аҕыс<num><subst><acc> : аҕыһы
    аҕыс<num><subst><par> : аҕыста
    аҕыс<num><subst><dat> : аҕыска

  "Cases 9": 
    тоҕус<num><subst><acc> : тоҕуһу
    тоҕус<num><subst><par> : тоҕуста
    тоҕус<num><subst><dat> : тоҕуска

  "Cases 10": 
    уон<num><subst><acc> : уону
    уон<num><subst><par> : уонна
    уон<num><subst><dat> : уоҥҥа

  "Cases 100": 
    сүүс<num><subst><acc> : сүүһү
    сүүс<num><subst><par> : сүүстэ
    сүүс<num><subst><dat> : сүүскэ
